Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1090.
do enact as follows:SB1090,11Section 1. 13.92 (1) (a) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1090,2,7213.92 (1) (a) 5. Prepare copy for the biennial Wisconsin Blue Book. Before 3contractually committing to the number of copies to be printed each biennium, the 4legislative reference bureau shall contact each legislative office to ask how many 5copies of the Blue Book, if any, that office requests and inform the office that the 6Blue Book is available online. The number requested from each legislative office 7may not exceed the cap under s. 35.84.SB1090,28Section 2. 13.94 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1090,2,15913.94 (1) (c) At the state auditor’s discretion or as the joint legislative audit 10committee directs, audit the central accounting records of the department of 11administration. A detailed report of such audit shall be filed as provided by par. (b), 12and copies shall be provided to each member or member-elect of the legislature and 13shall be available in limited number to the public. The bureau shall also prepare a 14summary of such audit report, for distribution in the same manner as the 15Wisconsin Blue Book as provided under s. 35.84.SB1090,316Section 3. 35.84 (intro.) and (figure) column E (title) of the statutes are 17amended to read:SB1090,3,51835.84 Distribution, to whom. (intro.) The department shall make 19distribution of official documents as indicated and shall charge the appropriations 1of the state agency publishing or arranging for publication of each official document 2for the total cost of distribution as determined under s. 35.80. Distribution is 3automatic unless indicated otherwise or except that, with respect to the Blue Book, 4the distribution shall be as determined under s. 13.92 (1) (a) 5. [See Figure 35.84 5following]SB1090,3,66Column E (title) Blue Books Audit Report Summaries; s. 35.24 (1) 13.94 (1) (c)SB1090,47Section 4. 35.84 (figure) column F of the statutes is created to read:SB1090,3,8835.84 (figure) column F Blue Books; s. 35.24 (1)SB1090,3,10910. Each Senator   10see s. 13.92 (1) (a) 5.; cap 600SB1090,3,131111. Each Representative to the Assembly 12   13see s. 13.92 (1) (a) 5.; cap 350SB1090,514Section 5. 84.02 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1090,3,221584.02 (5) (b) Upon publication of the highway service maps, the department 16shall contact each member of the legislature to ask how many copies of the highway 17service maps, if any, that member requests. The department shall distribute the 18requested maps without charge 50 of these maps to each officer and member of the 19legislature. The number of highway service maps requested from each member of 20the legislature may not exceed 50. Any officer or member of the legislature may 21request additional highway service maps. The A request may be written or oral. 22The fee for the additional maps shall be the fee set by the department under par. (a).SB1090,623Section 6. 84.02 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1090,4,9184.02 (5) (c) Upon publication of the folded highway maps, the department 2shall contact each member of the legislature to ask how many copies of the folded 3highway maps, if any, that member requests. The department shall distribute the 4requested maps without charge 500 of these maps to each officer and member of the 5legislature and 300 of these maps to the legislative reference bureau. Any officer or 6member of the legislature may request additional folded highway maps. The 7request may be written or oral. No charge may be made for the additional folded 8highway maps. The number of folded highway maps requested from each member 9of the legislature may not exceed 500.SB1090,4,1010